Nevada, session 83, SB281.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall allocate $2,500,000 of the money in the Fund for a
Resilient Nevada created by NRS 433.732 for reimbursement of
costs incurred during the 2025-2027 biennium for providing a
program to support persons who are 18 years of age and older but
less than 23 years of age and are transitioning from foster care to
independent living to:
1. Clark County for reimbursement of not more than the
following amounts:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $671,762
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $671,762
2. Washoe County for reimbursement of not more than the
following amounts:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $518,257
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $534,296
3. The Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department of Health and Human Services for reimbursement of not
more than the following amounts:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $51,962
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $51,961
Sec. 3.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services the sum of $11,897,709
for the provision of a jail-based behavioral health program during
the 2025-2027 biennium.
2. Of the amount appropriated by subsection 1, the Division
shall allocate for use for the purpose set forth in subsection 1:
(a) The sum of $6,393,106 to Clark County; and
(b) The sum of $5,504,603 to Washoe County.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
*SB281_R3*

– 3 –
Sec. 3.7. 1. To the extent that money is available, there is
hereby appropriated from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created
by NRS 433.732 to the Center for the Application of Substance
Abuse Technologies within the School of Public Health at the
University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of $750,000 for the provision
of an online graduate certification concerning co-occurring
behavioral health and wellness.
2. If there is insufficient money available to make the full
appropriation provided pursuant to subsection 1, there is hereby
appropriated from the State General Fund to the Center for the
Application of Substance Abuse Technologies within the School of
Public Health at the University of Nevada, Reno, a sufficient
amount of money to pay the remaining amount of the appropriation
set forth in subsection 1 for the provision of an online graduate
certification concerning co-occurring behavioral health and
wellness.
3. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
appropriate fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB281_R3*